Utah statutes.
63G-6a-1909.   Affect of violation found prior to award of contract.

If, before award of a contract, it is determined administratively or upon administrative or judicial review that a procurement or proposed award of a contract is in violation of law, the procurement or proposed award shall be cancelled or revised to comply with the law.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session, (Coordination Clause)

